Utah statutes.
63E-2-104.   Legislative review.
(1)  Each independent corporation is subject to review by the Retirement and
Independent Entities Committee in accordance with Chapter 1, Independent
Entities Act.
(2)  Notwithstanding Section 36-12-15, the Office of Legislative Auditor
General may conduct comprehensive and special purpose audits, examinations,
and reviews of any independent corporation.
(3)  Each independent corporation shall report, as requested, to the committee
on matters related to audits.
